District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Judith Heumann Memorial Workers with Disabilities Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec 2. The District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982
(D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-201.01 passim), is amended by adding a new title IV-A
to read as follows:
“TITLE IV-A – DISTRICT WORKERS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM
“Sec. 411. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this title, the term:
“(1) “Certification period” means the period of enrollment for the program, which
shall begin on the date of approval and end on the date by which eligibility must be
redetermined.
“(2) “DHCF” means the Department of Health Care Finance.
“(3) “Disability” shall have the same meaning as in section 1614(a)(3)(A) of the
Social Security Act, approved October 30, 1972 (86 Stat. 1471; 42 U.S.C. § 1382c(a)(3)(A)),
except for the provision of substantial gainful activity.
“(4) “Employed”:
“(A) Shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1905(v)(2) of the
Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 351; 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(v)(2)); or
“(B) If self-employed, means the individual has engaged in paid work,
subject to verification with applicable District and federal employment and tax requirements.
“(5) “Enrollee” means an individual who is enrolled in the program and provided
coverage under Medicaid.
“(6) “Program” means the District Workers with Disabilities Program established
by this title.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Sec. 412. Establishment of the District Workers with Disabilities Program.
“(a)(1) No earlier than October 1, 2027, there shall be established the District Workers
with Disabilities Program, to be administered by the Department of Health Care Finance, to
provide eligible individuals with disabilities with Medicaid coverage, as authorized by section
1902 of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 344; 42 U.S.C. § 1396a).
“(2) Within 6 months of the applicable date of this title, DHCF shall submit for
approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services an amendment to the Medicaid
state plan to authorize the Medicaid payments described in this title.
“(b) An individual shall be eligible for the program if they:
“(1) Are 16 years old or older;
“(2) Are a resident of the District;
“(3) Are employed, which may be verified by providing one or more of the
following:
“(A) Recent pay stub;
“(B) A letter from their employer verifying employment;
“(C) Bank statement showing deposit of earnings;
“(D) Federal and District income tax returns from the most recent year for
which returns are available;
“(E) Evidence of payment of estimated taxes, if self-employed; or
“(F) Business ledgers, if self-employed;
“(4) Have a disability; and
“(5) Are not:
“(A) Residing in a medical institution or long-term care facility, such as a
nursing facility or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities;
“(B) An inmate of a public institution;
“(C) An inpatient in an institution for mental illness; provided, that an
individual shall be deemed ineligible solely because of a temporary inpatient admission for
behavioral health treatment; or
“(D) Enrolled in:
“(i) Medicaid;
“(ii) The DC Healthcare Alliance;
“(iii) The DC Healthy Families program; or
“(iv) The Child and Adolescent Supplemental Security Income
Program.
“(c) An applicant shall be deemed disabled for purposes of subsection (b)(4) of this
section if they:
“(1) Receive Social Security Disability Insurance (“SSDI”) benefits;
“(2) Previously received SSDI or Supplemental Security Income, but lost
eligibility for a reason other than medical improvement; or
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) Are determined to be disabled by DHCF in accordance with this title and
implementing regulations.
“(d) DHCF may conduct periodically reviews of an enrollee’s disability status and
establish intervals for such reviews by rulemaking; provided, that the intervals are reasonable
and consistent with federal law.
“Sec. 413. Application process.
“(a) DHCF shall post on its website and provide, upon request, written information about
the program, including:
“(1) Eligibility requirements;
“(2) The coverage, scope, and related services under the program;
“(3) Rights and obligations of applicants and enrollees under the program; and
“(4) The application form and instructions.
“(b)(1) An applicant shall apply for the program by submitting the following documents
and information to DHCF:
“(A) The application form and documentation;
“(B) The Social Security number of the applicant; and
“(C) A signed consent form by the applicant or their legally authorized
representative authorizing DHCF to verify the applicant’s information with employers, banks,
and public or private agencies.
“(2) Upon request, an applicant shall:
“(A) Participate in interviews to verify their eligibility; and
“(B) Provide additional documentation necessary to process their
application.
“(3) For an applicant whose disability has been determined by the Social Security
Administration, DHCF shall, no later than 30 days from the application date:
“(A) Determine the applicant’s eligibility, including their required
premium, if any; or
“(B) Determine that additional information or verification is required and
provide notice to the applicant of the information needed and deadlines for submission.
“(c)(1) An individual temporarily residing outside of the District but who intends to
return to the District may apply by mail; provided, that they can demonstrate long-term residency
in the District.
“(2) An applicant may voluntarily withdraw an application at any time. An
application that has been withdrawn may not be revived unless permitted by DHCF through
procedures established by rulemaking.
“(d) If DHCF determines that an applicant is:
“(1) Eligible for enrollment in the program, DHCF shall issue written notice to the
applicant and identify the beginning and ending dates of coverage; or
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) Not eligible for enrollment in the program, DHCF shall issue a written notice
of its denial and include its findings and reason for denial, the applicable statutory or regulatory
basis for the denial, and the applicant’s right to appeal.
“(e) An applicant shall be denied enrollment in the program if they:
“(1) Do not meet the eligibility criteria;
“(2) Fail to submit a complete application or provide requested documentation
within the required timeframe;
“(3) Fail to cooperate with DHCF’s eligibility determination process;
“(4) Fail to comply with program participating requirements set by DHCF
through rulemaking; or
“(5) Fail to comply with any deadline established by DHCF; provided, that DHCF
shall extend any deadline to provide additional documentation if the applicant is prevented from
providing the documentation due to circumstances beyond their control or if there is an
administrative delay or emergency beyond DHCF’s control. The extension shall remain in effect
for as long as the emergency circumstances persist.
“(f)(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an applicant’s
certification period shall be 12 months.
“(2) An enrollee may be terminated from the program during the certification
period if they:
“(A) No longer meet the eligibility criteria;
“(B) Fail to cooperate with DHCF’s requests for information or
documentation;
“(C) Fail to comply with program participation requirements set by DHCF
through rulemaking; or
“(D) Fail to pay the required premiums after receiving 30 days of notice of
late payment.
“(3) If DHCF terminates an enrollee from the program, it shall:
“(A) Inform the enrollee of their rights and obligations under the program;
and
“(B) Provide written notice of termination and include its findings and
reasons for denials, the applicable statutory or regulatory basis for the denial, and the enrollee’s
right to appeal.
“(g) DHCF shall:
“(1) Maintain a case record for each applicant with documentation of eligibility;
and
“(2) Limit disclosures of information to purposes directly connected with
verifying program eligibility and administration.
“Sec. 414. Premiums.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a)(1) To determine countable net income, DHCF shall subtract from the enrollee’s total
gross income:
“(A) The general income exclusions and disregards and the specific
income exclusions and disregards for aged, blind, or disabled coverage groups as specified under
section 405; and
“(B) Any documented cost-sharing for current employer-sponsored
insurance coverage for the applicant.
“(2) DHCF shall include in the enrollee’s total gross income any annuity, pension,
retirement, or disability benefits to which the enrollee is entitled, including:
“(A) Veterans’ compensation and pensions;
“(B) Social Security Disability Insurance and other Social Security
benefits;
“(C) Railroad retirement benefits; and
“(D) Unemployment compensation.
“(b) An enrollee’s assets or income may not be considered in determining an enrollee’s
eligibility for coverage under the program.
“(c) An enrollee shall pay a monthly premium of:
“(1) For incomes at or below 138% of the federal poverty level, $0 per month;
“(2) For incomes above 138% to 200% of the federal poverty level, $25 per
month;
“(3) For incomes above 200% to 250% of the federal poverty level, $40 per
month;
“(4) For incomes above 250% to 300% of the federal poverty level, $55 per
month;
“(5) For incomes above 300% to 450% of the federal poverty level, 4% of net
countable monthly income;
“(6) For incomes above 450% to 600% of the federal poverty level, 5% of net
countable monthly income; and
“(7) For incomes above 600% of the federal poverty level, 7.5% of net countable
monthly income.
“(d) DHCF may, through rulemaking, adjust annually the monthly premium amounts to
account for changes to the Consumer Price Index.
“(e)(1)(A) An enrollee shall timely submit the applicable monthly premium unless they
submit a claim of hardship.
“(B)(i) DHCF may grant a claim of hardship if payment of the monthly
premium would compromise the enrollee’s ability to obtain basic food, shelter, or clothing.
“(ii) DHCF shall issue a written decision on an enrollee’s hardship
claim within 30 days of receipt.
“(iii) If DHCF denies the hardship claim, the enrollee shall pay the
outstanding premium within 10 days of receiving notice.
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) DHCF shall allow a grace period of up to 6 months within a 12-month period
for enrollees who lose employment involuntarily or for medical reasons to remain in the
program; provided, that the enrollee continues to pay the applicable premium.
“(3) An enrollee who fails to pay the required premium within 30 days of notice
shall be terminated from the program and may not re-enroll until all outstanding premiums have
been paid.
“Sec. 415. Recertification.
“(a)(1) An enrollee shall submit a recertification application to DHCF annually to
continue to receive coverage under the program.
“(2) DHCF shall issue a recertification form to each enrollee at least 60 days prior
to the end of the current certification period.
“(3) An enrollee shall submit the recertification application and all documentation
by the last day of the certification period; provided, that an enrollee has up to 90 days after the
certification period to submit additional materials requested by DHCF. If the enrollee is deemed
eligible during the 90-day period, the enrollee’s coverage shall be retroactive to the first day of
the new certification period.
“(b)(1) DHCF may reject an applicant’s recertification application for any reason outlined
in section 413(e) or (f).
“(2) If DHCF finds that an applicant is no longer eligible, it shall issue a written
notice of termination and provide its findings and reason for termination, the applicable statutory
or regulatory basis for the termination, any refund of enrollment fees, and the right to appeal.
“Sec. 416. Responsibilities of the enrollee and liability.
“(a) An enrollee or the enrollee’s authorized legal representative shall:
“(1) Notify DHCF within 30 days of any change that may affect the enrollee’s
eligibility in the program;
“(2) Limit use of the program benefits to the individual whose name appears on
the health insurance card;
“(3) Cooperate with DHCF in providing forms and information necessary for
eligibility, program integrity, and third-party reimbursement;
“(4) Provide timely notice to DHCF of any accident or incident giving rise to
potential third-party liability, including the identities of parties involved, attorneys, and insurers;
“(5) Report any known third-party health insurance coverage or other party that
may be liable for the cost of care, and shall cooperate in DHCF’s efforts to recover such costs;
and
“(6) Discontinue use of program benefits upon receipt of written notice of
ineligibility or termination.
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b) An enrollee’s failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section may result in
termination of benefits under this title, the recovery of improperly paid benefits, and any other
remedies available under District or federal law.
“(c) An enrollee shall:
“(1) Be deemed to have authorized DHCF to access records and information
necessary to pursue third-party reimbursement;
“(2) Assign to DHCF the right to collect available benefits from any liable third
party; and
“(3) Assist and cooperate with DHCF in recovering available third-party benefits
and payments.
“(d) DHCF may recover the cost of medical assistance improperly paid on behalf of an
enrollee under this program, including:
“(1) Benefits paid for any period during which the enrollee was not eligible for
coverage;
“(2) Benefits paid as a result of misrepresentation, failure to report, or failure to
cooperate with program requirements; and
“(3) Benefits paid pending the outcome of a hearing where DHCF’s adverse
action is upheld.
“(e) DHCF may impose a lien and seek reimbursement against property or assets of a
current or former enrollee to the extent permitted by federal and District law.
“(f) DHCF may accept voluntary repayment from a current or former enrollee, or from a
person acting on behalf of the enrollee, for the cost of benefits improperly paid.
“(g) An applicant or enrollee of the program may contest a determination made by
DHCF by requesting a fair hearing under the procedures set forth in section 109 of the District of
Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, effective October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1208; D.C. Official
Code § 2-509).
“Sec. 417. Scope of coverage.
“(a) An enrollee shall be eligible for medically necessary services if the services are:
“(1) Furnished by a provider who is approved by DHCF to participate in the
District’s Medicaid program;
“(2) Covered under the District’s Medicaid state plan;
“(3) Not otherwise covered under employer-sponsored insurance or any other
health insurance available to the enrollee; and
“(4) Not subject to third party liability.
“(b) The District shall not cover copayments, deductibles, or coinsurance applicable to
employee sponsored insurance coverage held by an enrollee.
“(c) An enrollee shall not be entitled to:
“(1) Enroll in Medicaid managed care programs administered by the District;
“(2) Enroll in the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly; or
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) Coverage of long-term care facility services exceeding 30 consecutive days.
“Sec. 418. Provider participation and reimbursement.
“(a) The requirements for provider participation and reimbursement for services
furnished to enrollees of the program shall be governed by DHCF through rulemaking,
including:
“(1) The general Medicaid provider participation criteria; and
“(2) The service-specific participation and reimbursement requirements, including
provisions applicable to physician services, hospital services, home health care, personal care,
and other covered benefits, as determined by DHCF.
“(b) A provider furnishing services to a recipient under this program shall seek payment
from any liable third party, including an insurer, before billing DHCF.
“Sec. 419. Rulemaking.
“The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue
rules to implement the provisions of this title.”.
“Sec. 420. District Workers with Disabilities Premium Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the District Workers with Disabilities Premium
Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by DHCF in accordance with subsections (c) and (d)
of this section.
“(b) All premium revenue funds collected pursuant to section 414 shall be deposited in the
Fund.
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used for the following purposes:
“(1) To offset the District’s share of Medicaid expenditures incurred for the
program; and
“(2) To support administrative costs directly attributable to the program.
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.
“Sec. 421. Investments in Medicaid-buy in software development.
“DHCF shall update the District of Columbia Access System (“DCAS”), including
building a platform to collect payment for premiums, for the purpose of implementing the
program established by this title.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Section 2 shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the
District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
9